Utah statutes.
58-60-104.   Term of license -- Expiration -- Renewal.

(1) (a)  The division shall issue each license under this chapter in accordance with a two-year renewal cycle established by division rule.

(b)  The division may by rule extend or shorten a renewal cycle by as much as one year to stagger the renewal cycles it administers.

(2)  At the time of renewal the licensee shall show satisfactory evidence of renewal requirements as required under this chapter.

(3)  Each license expires on the expiration date shown on the license unless renewed by the licensee in accordance with Section 58-1-308.



Enacted by Chapter 32, 1994 General Session

